Illinois, session 104th, SB1802.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 65 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Applicant" means a person who is applying for a license 9to carry a concealed firearm under this Act.10    "Board" means the Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board.11    "Concealed firearm" means a loaded or unloaded handgun 12carried on or about a person completely or mostly concealed 13from view of the public or on or about a person within a 14vehicle.15    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 16Police.17    "Grounds" means any area that is within 75 feet from the 18entrance to any prohibited area on real property belonging to 19a forest preserve district, as identified in subsection (a-6) 20of Section 65, or any area enclosed by fencing located on real 21property belonging to a forest preserve district, whichever 22area is greater. "Grounds" does not include parking lots. 23    "Handgun" means any device which is designed to expel a   SB1802- 2 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1projectile or projectiles by the action of an explosion, 2expansion of gas, or escape of gas that is designed to be held 3and fired by the use of a single hand. "Handgun" does not 4include:5        (1) a stun gun or taser;6        (2) a machine gun as defined in item (i) of paragraph 7    (7) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code 8    of 2012;9        (3) a short-barreled rifle or shotgun as defined in 10    item (ii) of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 11    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; or12        (4) any pneumatic gun, spring gun, paint ball gun, or 13    B-B gun which expels a single globular projectile not 14    exceeding .18 inch in diameter, or which has a maximum 15    muzzle velocity of less than 700 feet per second, or which 16    expels breakable paint balls containing washable marking 17    colors.18    "Law enforcement agency" means any federal, State, or 19local law enforcement agency, including offices of State's 20Attorneys and the Office of the Attorney General.21    "License" means a license issued by the Illinois State 22Police to carry a concealed handgun.23    "Licensee" means a person issued a license to carry a 24concealed handgun.25    "Municipality" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1 26of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.  SB1802- 3 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    "Unit of local government" has the meaning ascribed to it 2in Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (430 ILCS 66/65)5    Sec. 65. Prohibited areas. 6    (a) A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly carry a 7firearm on or into:8        (1) Any building, real property, and parking area 9    under the control of a public or private elementary or 10    secondary school.11        (2) Any building, real property, and parking area 12    under the control of a pre-school or child care facility, 13    including any room or portion of a building under the 14    control of a pre-school or child care facility. Nothing in 15    this paragraph shall prevent the operator of a child care 16    facility in a family home from owning or possessing a 17    firearm in the home or license under this Act, if no child 18    under child care at the home is present in the home or the 19    firearm in the home is stored in a locked container when a 20    child under child care at the home is present in the home.21        (3) Any building, parking area, or portion of a 22    building under the control of an officer of the executive 23    or legislative branch of government, provided that nothing 24    in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensee from carrying 25    a concealed firearm onto the real property, bikeway, or   SB1802- 4 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    trail in a park regulated by the Department of Natural 2    Resources or any other designated public hunting area or 3    building where firearm possession is permitted as 4    established by the Department of Natural Resources under 5    Section 1.8 of the Wildlife Code.6        (4) Any building designated for matters before a 7    circuit court, appellate court, or the Supreme Court, or 8    any building or portion of a building under the control of 9    the Supreme Court.10        (5) Any building or portion of a building under the 11    control of a unit of local government.12        (6) Any building, real property, and parking area 13    under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or 14    correctional institution, prison, or jail.15        (7) Any building, real property, and parking area 16    under the control of a public or private hospital or 17    hospital affiliate, mental health facility, or nursing 18    home.19        (8) Any bus, train, or form of transportation paid for 20    in whole or in part with public funds, and any building, 21    real property, and parking area under the control of a 22    public transportation facility paid for in whole or in 23    part with public funds.24        (9) Any building, real property, and parking area 25    under the control of an establishment that serves alcohol 26    on its premises, if more than 50% of the establishment's   SB1802- 5 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    gross receipts within the prior 3 months is from the sale 2    of alcohol. The owner of an establishment who knowingly 3    fails to prohibit concealed firearms on its premises as 4    provided in this paragraph or who knowingly makes a false 5    statement or record to avoid the prohibition on concealed 6    firearms under this paragraph is subject to the penalty 7    under subsection (c-5) of Section 10-1 of the Liquor 8    Control Act of 1934.9        (10) Any public gathering or special event conducted 10    on property open to the public that requires the issuance 11    of a permit from the unit of local government, provided 12    this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must 13    walk through a public gathering in order to access his or 14    her residence, place of business, or vehicle.15        (11) Any building or real property that has been 16    issued a Special Event Retailer's license as defined in 17    Section 1-3.17.1 of the Liquor Control Act during the time 18    designated for the sale of alcohol by the Special Event 19    Retailer's license, or a Special use permit license as 20    defined in subsection (q) of Section 5-1 of the Liquor 21    Control Act during the time designated for the sale of 22    alcohol by the Special use permit license.23        (12) Any public playground.24        (13) Any public park, athletic area, or athletic 25    facility under the control of a municipality or park 26    district, provided nothing in this Section shall prohibit   SB1802- 6 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    a licensee from carrying a concealed firearm while on a 2    trail or bikeway if only a portion of the trail or bikeway 3    includes a public park.4        (14) (Blank). Any real property under the control of 5    the Cook County Forest Preserve District.6        (15) Any building, classroom, laboratory, medical 7    clinic, hospital, artistic venue, athletic venue, 8    entertainment venue, officially recognized 9    university-related organization property, whether owned or 10    leased, and any real property, including parking areas, 11    sidewalks, and common areas under the control of a public 12    or private community college, college, or university.13        (16) Any building, real property, or parking area 14    under the control of a gaming facility licensed under the 15    Illinois Gambling Act or the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 16    1975, including an inter-track wagering location licensee.17        (17) Any stadium, arena, or the real property or 18    parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or any 19    collegiate or professional sporting event.20        (18) Any building, real property, or parking area 21    under the control of a public library.22        (19) Any building, real property, or parking area 23    under the control of an airport.24        (20) Any building, real property, or parking area 25    under the control of an amusement park.26        (21) Any building, real property, or parking area   SB1802- 7 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    under the control of a zoo or museum.2        (22) Any street, driveway, parking area, property, 3    building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used 4    by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site 5    or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory 6    Commission. The licensee shall not under any circumstance 7    store a firearm or ammunition in his or her vehicle or in a 8    compartment or container within a vehicle located anywhere 9    in or on the street, driveway, parking area, property, 10    building, or facility described in this paragraph.11        (23) Any area where firearms are prohibited under 12    federal law.13    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a public or 14private community college, college, or university from:15        (1) prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm within 16    a vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by the college or 17    university;18        (2) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 19    regarding student, employee, or visitor misconduct and 20    discipline, including suspension and expulsion;21        (3) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 22    regarding the storage or maintenance of firearms, which 23    must include designated areas where persons can park 24    vehicles that carry firearms; and25        (4) permitting the carrying or use of firearms for the 26    purpose of instruction and curriculum of officially   SB1802- 8 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1    recognized programs, including but not limited to military 2    science and law enforcement training programs, or in any 3    designated area used for hunting purposes or target 4    shooting.5    (a-6) Nothing in this Act prohibits a forest preserve 6district from prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm into 7any botanic garden, swimming pool, grounds of a swimming pool, 8athletic venue, picnic grove, nature center, grounds of a 9nature center, pavilion, grounds of a pavilion, golf course, 10driving range, adventure course, grounds of an adventure 11course, zipline building, grounds of a zipline, equestrian 12center, grounds of an equestrian center, exercise venue, 13grounds of an exercise venue, or any public or private 14gathering or special event conducted on property that requires 15the issuance of a permit. 16    (a-10) The owner of private real property of any type may 17prohibit the carrying of concealed firearms on the property 18under his or her control. The owner must post a sign in 19accordance with subsection (d) of this Section indicating that 20firearms are prohibited on the property, unless the property 21is a private residence.22    (b) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (a-5), and (a-10) of 23this Section except under paragraph (22) or (23) of subsection 24(a), any licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm 25into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in 26subsection (a), (a-5), or (a-10) of this Section shall be   SB1802- 9 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1permitted to carry a concealed firearm on or about his or her 2person within a vehicle into the parking area and may store a 3firearm or ammunition concealed in a case within a locked 4vehicle or locked container out of plain view within the 5vehicle in the parking area. A licensee may carry a concealed 6firearm in the immediate area surrounding his or her vehicle 7within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited 8purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within the 9vehicle's trunk. For purposes of this subsection, "case" 10includes a glove compartment or console that completely 11encloses the concealed firearm or ammunition, the trunk of the 12vehicle, or a firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other 13container.14    (c) A licensee shall not be in violation of this Section 15while he or she is traveling along a public right of way that 16touches or crosses any of the premises under subsection (a), 17(a-5), (a-6), or (a-10) of this Section if the concealed 18firearm is carried on his or her person in accordance with the 19provisions of this Act or is being transported in a vehicle by 20the licensee in accordance with all other applicable 21provisions of law.22    (d) Signs stating that the carrying of firearms is 23prohibited shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the 24entrance of a building, premises, or real property specified 25in this Section as a prohibited area, unless the building, or 26premises, or real property is a private residence or a forest   SB1802- 10 -LRB104 08920 RLC 18975 b1preserve district. Signs shall be of a uniform design as 2established by the Illinois State Police and shall be 4 inches 3by 6 inches in size. The Illinois State Police shall adopt 4rules for standardized signs to be used under this subsection.5(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)